Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3309.01
Licensed animal therapist, defined.

Licensed animal
therapist means an individual who (1) has and maintains an undisciplined license
under the Uniform Credentialing Act for a health care profession other than
veterinary medicine and surgery, (2) has met the standards for additional
training regarding the performance of that health care profession on animals
as required by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department
upon the recommendation of the board, and (3) is licensed as an animal therapist
by the department.

Laws 2009, LB463, § 5.